Vermont, session 2025-2026, H45.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. 13 V.S.A. § 4028 is added to read:
§ 4028. POSSESSION OF FIREARMS PROHIBITED ON PREMISES
LICENSED TO SERVE ALCOHOL
(a) A person shall not knowingly possess a firearm on premises where
alcohol is licensed to be served.
VT LEG #378636 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.45
2025 Page 2 of 3
(b) The owner or operator of a premises where alcohol is licensed to be
served shall cause notice of the provisions of this section to be posted
conspicuously at each public entrance to the premises.
(c)(1) A person who violates subsection (a) of this section shall be
imprisoned for not more than one year or fined not more than $1,000.00, or
both.
(2) A person who violates subsection (b) of this section shall be fined
not more than $500.00.
(d) A permit or license to serve alcohol at a premises granted pursuant to
Title 7 may be suspended or revoked by the control commissioners or the
Board of Liquor and Lottery pursuant to chapter 9 of that title if a second or
subsequent violation of subsection (a) or (b) of this section occurs at the
premises.
(e) This section shall not apply to:
(1) premises used by the holder of a second-class license; or
(2) a firearm possessed by:
(A) a federal law enforcement officer or a law enforcement officer
certified as a law enforcement officer by the Vermont Criminal Justice
Training Council pursuant to 20 V.S.A. § 2358, for legitimate law enforcement
purposes;
VT LEG #378636 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.45
2025 Page 3 of 3
(B) a law enforcement officer of another state who is authorized to
carry a firearm by the officer’s state or local law enforcement agency and is
carrying the firearm for legitimate law enforcement purposes;
(C) a member of the Vermont National Guard, of the National Guard
of another state, or of the U.S. Armed Forces who is on duty and acting under
state or federal orders; or
(D) the owner of the premises, provided the owner is not prohibited
from possessing a firearm under state or federal law.
(e) As used in this section, “firearm” has the same meaning as in subsection
4017(d) of this title.
Sec. 2. EFFECTIVE DATE
This act shall take effect on passage.
VT LEG #378636 v.1